Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Chapter 88. Employment of Members of the National Guard and Veterans.

History.

(§ 2 ch 71 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 71, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on October 27, 2018.

Sec. 23.88.010.
National guard member and veteran hiring preference allowed.

A private employer may grant an employment preference to a member of the national guard or a veteran when hiring an employee. In this section,

“member of the national guard” means a person presently serving as a member in good standing in the national guard;

“veteran” means a person who was discharged under honorable conditions from service in

the armed forces of the United States;

a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States;

the Alaska Territorial Guard;

the Alaska Army National Guard;

the Alaska Air National Guard; or

the Alaska Naval Militia.

History.

(§ 2 ch 71 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 2,
ch. 71, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on October 27, 2018.